New Jersey, session 222, S3044.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A school district under State intervention which has not successfully met the governance component of school district effectiveness, or the State on behalf of the district, shall not enter into a lease for a building as a lessee, if the total lease cost over the term of the lease would exceed the purchase price of the building. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.